District of Columbia statutes.
16-528

Judgment protects garnishee.

A judgment of condemnation against a garnishee, and execution thereon, or payment by the garnishee in obedience to the judgment or an order of the court, is a sufficient defense to any action brought against him by the defendant in the action in which the attachment is issued, for or concerning the property or credits so condemned.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 551, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-528.
1973 Ed., § 16-528.